New Jersey, session 221, A2979.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. As used in this section, "Early Intervention Support Services Program" means a program that provides rapid access to short term, recovery-oriented crisis intervention and crisis stabilization services to an individual 18 years of age or older with a serious mental illness and includes, but is not limited to, medication, therapy, and case management services, which are offered at an on-site location, other than a hospital, or through outreach in the community. b.   The Department of Human Services shall expand the Early Intervention Support Services Programs currently available in 11 counties in the State to provide for one such program in each county in the State. c.   Any program that is operating in the State upon the effective date of P.L. c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and provides the services as set forth in subsection a. of this section shall be designated by the department as an Early Intervention Support Services Program pursuant to this bill. d.   The department shall coordinate with each county Early Intervention Support Services Program in the State to provide for education about the program, and accessibility to the program, to members of the public served by a county program and to those organizations or persons who may be the source of referrals to the county program. e.   The department shall utilize the moneys available to it for the program to ensure that funding is available for: (1)  expanding the program to each county in the State; and (2)  the expansion of a program in existence on the effective date of this act, based on the needs of the program to provide services. f.    The department shall: (1)  collect, at a minimum, information from each Early Intervention Support Services Program in the State about the services provided by the program, the utilization of these services, and the number of individuals who have been stabilized and referred to treatment in the community; and (2)  issue, within 18 months of the effective date of this act and annually thereafter, a report to the Governor and pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) to the Legislature, based on the information collected pursuant to paragraph (1) of this section.  The report shall include a review and analysis of each Early Intervention Support Services Program in the State and any recommendations for improvement to the programs. 2.   The Commissioner of Human Services may, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt any rules and regulations as the commissioner deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. 3.   This act shall take effect on the first day of the 13th month next following the date of enactment, except the Commissioner of Human Services may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.